Hawaii statutes.
[§711-1109.7] Pet animal or equine
animal desertion. (1) It shall be unlawful for the owner or any person in
possession of any pet animal or equine animal to desert the pet animal or
equine animal.

(2) Any person who violates subsection (1)
shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and subject to a fine not exceeding
$1,000 in addition to any other penalties.

(3) Any person who violates subsection (1) and
recklessly causes the death of or substantial bodily injury to the pet animal
or equine animal shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine not
exceeding $2,000 in addition to any other penalties.

(4) Each pet animal or equine animal that is
deserted in violation of subsection (1) or suffers death or substantial bodily
injury as a result of a violation of subsection (1) shall constitute a separate
offense.

(5) For the purposes of this section,
"desert" means to leave without the intent to return. [L 2016, c 165,
§2]

Revision Note

Subsections redesignated pursuant to §23G-15.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §§711-1109 TO 711-1110

Act 165, Session Laws 2016, added §711-1109.7, establishing
the offense of pet animal or equine animal desertion. The legislature found
that thousands of animals, primarily dogs and cats, were abandoned across Hawaii
every year, contributing to increased animal control costs, animal suffering
and overpopulation, increased euthanasia rates at local animal shelters, and
possible harm to native wildlife. The legislature further found that stronger
penalties for animal desertion would encourage pet owners to work with local
shelters and animal control contractors when a pet must be re-homed, strengthen
pet retention and the human-animal bond, and protect pet owners and the animals
themselves. Conference Committee Report No. 117-16.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next